Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.450

Jury to assess amount of recovery.

When a verdict is found for the plaintiff in an action for the recovery of money, or for the defendant when a setoff for the recovery of money is established beyond the amount of the plaintiff's claim as established, the jury shall also assess the amount of the recovery; they may also, under the direction of the court, assess the amount of the recovery when the court gives judgment for a party on the pleadings.

[ 2003 c 406 s 25; 1891 c 60 s 3; Code 1881 s 244; 1877 p 50 s 248; 1869 p 60 s 248; 1854 p 167 s 202; RRS s 366.]